Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REAL-TIME STENOGRAPHIC WRITER TRAINING GRANT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "real-time stenographic writer" means a writer that translates spoken word into text utilizing a stenographic machine and a shorthand theory based on phonetics. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment and application. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of the Office of Higher Education must establish a grant program for eligible institutions under Minnesota Statutes, section 136A.103, to promote the training and job placement of real-time stenographic writers, including court reporters and closed captioners. new text end new text begin (b) The grant application must include (1) a description of the training and assistance to be funded using the grant amount, including how the training and assistance will increase the number of real-time stenographic writers, and (2) a description of how the eligible institution intends to continue providing the training and assistance to be funded by the grant after the end of the grant period. The commissioner may determine additional application requirements and establish deadlines to which Minnesota Statutes, chapter 14, including Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, do not apply. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Awarding grants. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must award two grants of $300,000 each year beginning the 2025-2026 academic year until the appropriation is expended. One grantee must be in the seven-county metropolitan area as defined by Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. The other grantee must be outside the seven-county metropolitan area. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall give a priority to eligible institutions that: new text end new text begin (1) possess the most substantial capability to increase their capacity to train real-time stenographic writers; new text end new text begin (2) demonstrate the most promising collaboration with educational institutions, businesses, labor organizations, or other community groups having the potential to train or provide job placement assistance to real-time stenographic writers; or new text end new text begin (3) propose the most promising and innovative approaches for initiating or expanding training or job placement assistance efforts with respect to real-time stenographic writers. new text end new text begin (c) The first grants must be awarded for the 2025-2026 academic year. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Individual grants and scholarships. new text end new text begin (a) If an eligible institution uses any of the grant money under this section for individual grants or scholarships, the grant or scholarship must comply with this paragraph. The amount of the grant or scholarship must be based on the amount of need of the scholarship recipient for financial assistance. To be eligible to receive a grant or scholarship under this section, a recipient must enter into an agreement with the enrolling school to be employed as a real-time stenographic writer for six months for each semester or equivalent in which the person receives a grant or scholarship. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must establish requirements for employment for recipients of grants or scholarships under paragraph (a), including requirements for repayment of grant or scholarship amounts in the event of failure to meet the requirements for employment. The commissioner may waive, in whole or in part, the requirements for repayment of grant or scholarship amounts on the basis of economic conditions which may affect the ability of scholarship recipients to find work as real-time stenographic writers. The requirements and waivers under this paragraph are not subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 14, including Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) By January 15 in any fiscal year an eligible institution receives a grant, the institution must submit a report to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an assessment by the institution of the effectiveness of activities carried out using such funds in increasing the number of real-time stenographic writers; and new text end new text begin (2) a description of the best practices identified by the eligible institution for increasing the number of individuals who are trained, employed, and retained in employment as real-time stenographic writers. new text end new text begin (b) In any year the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education receives a report under paragraph (a), the commissioner must report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over higher education the results of the reports under paragraph (a) and recommendations for the program. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $3,150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education for purposes of section 1. This is a onetime appropriation and is available through June 30, 2029. This funding is only intended for the educational training of real-time stenographic writers and must not be used to fund digital recording or artificial intelligence transcription. The commissioner may use up to five percent of this appropriation for administrative costs. new text end